Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.020

Other terms defined.

Whenever the word "person" is used in this chapter, the same shall be construed to include any company, corporation or association, the state or any county therein, and the words "city" or "town" wherever used, shall be construed to be either. Whenever the words "installment" or "installments" are used in this chapter, they shall be construed to include installment or installments of interest, as provided in RCW 8.12.420. Whenever the words "public markets" are used in this chapter and the public market is managed in whole or in part by a public corporation created by a city, the words shall be construed to include all real or personal property located in a district or area designated by a city as a public market and traditionally devoted to providing farmers, crafts vendors and other merchants with retail space to market their wares to the public. Property located in such a district or area need not be exclusively or primarily used for such traditional public market retail activities and may include property used for other public purposes including, but not limited to, the provision of human services and low-income or moderate-income housing.

[ 1990 c 189 s 2; 1925 ex.s. c 115 s 4; 1907 c 153 s 52; RRS s 9277. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 51; 1893 c 84 s 51.]